Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202081-5,233
Reciprocity.

Upon application, an elevator mechanic license or an elevator contractor license may be issued to a person holding a valid license from a state having standards substantially equal to those of the Conveyance Safety Act.

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 24;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-2524;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 69.